Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.460

Planning agency—Annual report.

After all or part of the comprehensive plan of a county has been approved by motion and certified, the planning agency shall render an annual report to the board on the status of the plan and accomplishments thereunder.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.460. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 46.]